West Virginia, session 2025, SB416.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of Commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-5-2 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (special projects and grants for West Virginia State Parks, State Forests, and State Rail Trails under the Division of Natural Resources, 58 CSR 34), is authorized.